Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202566-1414
Fuel tax; disposition; Motor Carrier Services Division Distributive Fund; created; use; investment.

(1) Any fuel tax collected pursuant to the agreement shall be credited to the Motor Carrier Services Division Distributive Fund to carry out the International Fuel Tax Agreement Act.

(2) The Motor Carrier Services Division Distributive Fund is created. Any money in the Motor Carrier Services Division Distributive Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Any interest received on money in the Motor Carrier Services Division Distributive Fund shall be credited to the Highway Trust Fund.

Laws 1988, LB 836, § 14;

Laws 1991, LB 627, § 137;

Laws 1994, LB 1066, § 56;

Laws 1994, LB 1160, § 115;

Laws 1995, LB 182, § 63;

Laws 1996, LB 1218, § 34;

Laws 1997, LB 720, § 22;

Laws 1998, LB 1056, § 6;

Laws 2003, LB 563, § 39;

Laws 2025, LB97, § 43.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.